Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5509
Company, defined.

Company means (1) any person subject to sales and use taxes and either the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 or the franchise tax under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807, (2) any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or joint venture that is or would otherwise be a member of the same unitary group, if incorporated, which is, or whose partners, members, or owners are, subject to such taxes, and any other partnership, limited liability company, subchapter S corporation, or joint venture when the partners, owners, shareholders, or members are subject to such taxes, (3) any cooperative exempt from such taxes under section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and (4) any limited cooperative association.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB368, § 138.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.